Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-944
Administering ballots to residents of nursing homes or hospitals; requirements.

The election commissioner or county clerk may train registered voters to act on behalf of the election commissioner or county clerk in administering a ballot to residents of nursing homes or hospitals who have requested ballots. Ballots shall be administered by two registered voters who are not affiliated with the same political party. The election commissioner or county clerk shall adopt procedures to carry out this section.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 287;

Laws 2005, LB 98, § 16.